Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.590

Public transportation fares—Powers of law enforcement authorities.

RCW 35.58.580 and 35.58.585 do not prevent law enforcement authorities from prosecuting for theft, trespass, or other charges by any individual who:

(1) Fails to pay the required fare on more than one occasion within a twelve-month period;

(2) Fails to timely select one of the options for responding to the notice of civil infraction after receiving a statement of the options for responding to the notice of infraction and the procedures necessary to exercise these options; or

(3) Fails to depart the bus or other mode of public transportation when requested to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

[ 2008 c 123 s 3.]